Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-204
Real estate taxes; when delinquent.

One-half of the taxes due under section 77-203 shall become delinquent on May 1 and the second half on September 1 next following the date the taxes become due, except that in counties having a population of more than one hundred thousand, the first half shall become delinquent April 1 and the second half August 1 next following the date the taxes become due.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 150, p. 442;

R.S.1913, § 6479;

C.S.1922, § 6002;

Laws 1925, c. 43, § 10, p. 172;

C.S.1929, § 77-1907;

Laws 1933, c. 134, § 1, p. 513;

Laws 1935, c. 151, § 1, p. 557;

Laws 1937, c. 167, § 2, p. 636;

Laws 1939, c. 98, § 2, p. 421;

Laws 1941, c. 157, § 2, p. 607;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-1959;

R.S.1943, § 77-204;

Laws 1961, c. 373, § 1, p. 1148;

Laws 1965, c. 471, § 1, p. 1518;

Laws 1967, c. 497, § 1, p. 1689;

Laws 1987, LB 508, § 4.